Maryland, session 2026, HB0705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
6–112.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FUND” MEANS THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
ENFORCEMENT RECOVERY FUND.
(3) “QUALIFIED RECOVERY” MEANS PENALTIES OBTAINED BY THE
OFFICE THROUGH ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS UNDER:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0705*

HOUSE BILL 705
(I) TITLE 11 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE;
(II) TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
(III) TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND
ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
(B) THERE IS AN OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ENFORCEMENT
RECOVERY FUND IN THE OFFICE.
(C) THE OFFICE SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, MONEY
DEPOSITED FROM QUALIFIED RECOVERIES; AND
(2) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO SUPPORT THE CONSUMER
PROTECTION, ANTITRUST, AND SECURITIES ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES OF THE
OFFICE, INCLUDING:
(1) INVESTIGATION AND PROSECUTION OF VIOLATIONS;
(2) EXPERT WITNESS FEES AND CONSULTING SERVICES;
(3) TECHNOLOGY AND DATA ANALYTICS TOOLS;
(4) TRAINING AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FOR
ENFORCEMENT STAFF;
(5) PUBLIC EDUCATION AND OUTREACH REGARDING CONSUMER
RIGHTS; AND
(6) ANY OTHER DIRECT ENFORCEMENT–RELATED EXPENSES.

HOUSE BILL 705 3
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE
GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(H) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY DEPOSIT INTO THE FUND UP TO
25% OF EACH QUALIFIED RECOVERY NOT TO EXCEED $7,500,000 PER FISCAL YEAR
IN AGGREGATE DEPOSITS FROM ALL QUALIFIED RECOVERIES.
(2) DEPOSITS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE MADE ONLY FROM
QUALIFIED RECOVERIES THAT:
(I) ARE OBTAINED THROUGH JUDGMENTS, SETTLEMENTS, OR
CONSENT DECREES;
(II) EXCEED $100,000 IN TOTAL RECOVERY AMOUNTS; AND
(III) ARE NOT OTHERWISE SPECIFICALLY DESIGNATED BY
COURT ORDER, SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT, OR STATE LAW FOR ALTERNATIVE
PURPOSES, INCLUDING RESTITUTION FOR VICTIMS.
(3) ANY AMOUNT DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE
PLACE OF FUNDING THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE APPROPRIATED TO THE OFFICE IN
THE STATE BUDGET; AND
(II) MAY NOT REDUCE AMOUNTS AVAILABLE FOR RESTITUTION
TO VICTIMS OR OTHER REMEDIAL PURPOSES.
(4) MONEY IN THE FUND MAY NOT BE USED FOR RESTITUTION OR
OTHER PAYMENTS TO VICTIMS OR THIRD PARTIES.
(5) THE EXISTENCE OF THE FUND MAY NOT BE USED AS A BASIS TO
REDUCE APPROPRIATIONS TO THE OFFICE BELOW THE LEVEL THAT WOULD
OTHERWISE BE PROVIDED.
(I) (1) AT THE END OF EACH FISCAL YEAR, IF THE BALANCE OF THE
FUND EXCEEDS $7,500,000, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL TRANSFER THE EXCESS
BALANCE TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 705
(2) ANY TRANSFER REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
COMPLETED WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.